Utah statutes.
7-3-1.   Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to all banks organized under the laws of this state, to all other banks doing business in this state as permitted by the laws and Constitution of the United States, and to all persons conducting banking business in this state except as provided in Chapter 1.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

